North Carolina statutes. Chapter 35. Sterilization Procedures.
Article 10. Interstate Compact on Mental Health. [Repealed]

§§ 35-64 through 35-69.
[Transferred]

Transferred to G.S. 122-99 to 122-104 by Session Laws 1963, c. 1184, s. 12.

Editor’s Note.

Chapter 122 was repealed by Session Laws 1985, c. 589, s. 1, effective January 1, 1986, and Chapter 122C was enacted. For the Interstate Compact on Mental Health, see now

G.S. 122C-361

et seq.